Massachusetts, session 194th, H3385.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Subsection (a) of section 39M of chapter 30 of the General Laws, as appearing in the
2022 Official Edition is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 21 to 23, the words “The
undersigned certifies under penalties of perjury this bid is in all respects bona fide, fair and made
without collusion or fraud with any other person” and inserting in place thereof the following
words –
“The undersigned certifies under penalties of perjury that this bid is in all respects bona
fide, fair and made without collusion with any other person or entity or fraud. As used in this
paragraph the word “fraud” shall mean a statement, act or omission relating to a material fact of
significant importance to the construction project at issue that (i) has been relied upon to
detriment of an awarding authority or its representatives (ii) is knowingly false or misleading or
of 2

is in reckless disregard of its truth or falsity and (iii) is intended to mislead and has been shown
by clear and convincing evidence to have done so”
of 2